Wisconsin, session 2025, AB548.
do enact as follows:AB548,11Section 1. 341.14 (6r) (b) 9. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB548,2,62341.14 (6r) (b) 9. b. A fee of $15 shall be charged for the issuance or reissuance 3of a plate for a special group specified under par. (f) 15m. to 15q., 19g., or 62. All 4moneys received under this subd. 9. b. in excess of the initial costs of production of 5the special group plate under par. (f) 15m., 2011 stats., or $23,700, whichever is 6less, shall be deposited in the veterans trust fund.AB548,27Section 2. 341.14 (6r) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB548,4,118341.14 (6r) (c) Special group plates shall display the word “Wisconsin”, the 9name of the applicable authorized special group, a symbol representing the special 10group, not exceeding one position, and identifying letters or numbers or both, not 11exceeding 7 positions and not less than one position. Except as provided in this 12paragraph, the department shall specify the design for special group plates, but the 13department shall consult the president of the University of Wisconsin System 14before specifying the word or symbol used to identify the special groups under par. 15(f) 35. to 47., the secretary of natural resources before specifying the word or symbol 16used to identify the special groups under par. (f) 50. and 59., the chief executive 17officer of the professional football team and an authorized representative of the 18league of professional football teams described in s. 229.823 to which that team 19belongs before specifying the design for the applicable special group plate under 20par. (f) 55., the chief trademark officer of Harley-Davidson Michigan, LLC before 21specifying the design for the applicable special group plate under par. (f) 61r., the 22department of veterans affairs before specifying the design for the special group 23plates under par. (f) 19g., 49d., 49h., and 49s., the department of tourism and chief 24executive officer of the organization specified in par. (f) 55m. before specifying the 1design and word or symbol used to identify the special group name for special group 2plates under par. (f) 55m., and the Three Harbors Council, Boy Scouts of America 3NESA License Committee before specifying the designs for the initial special group 4plate under par. (f) 66. Special group plates under par. (f) 50. shall be as similar as 5possible to regular registration plates in color and design. Special group plates 6issued under par. (f) 62. shall display the words “In God We Trust”. The 7department shall make available 2 designs for the special group plates under par. 8(f) 60. The department may not specify any design for the special group plates 9under par. (f) 60. unless the design is approved by the executive vice president of the 10Milwaukee Brewers Baseball Club LP. The department may not specify any design 11for the special group plates under par. (f) 65. unless the design is approved by the 12president of the Milwaukee Bucks. The word or symbol used to identify the special 13group under par. (f) 59. shall be different from the word or symbol used to identify 14the special group under par. (f) 50. and the design shall cover the entire plate. 15Special group plates under par. (f) 61m. shall display a logo or image of the lion 16associated with the Lions Clubs International. Special group plates under par. (f) 1761r. shall display a bar and shield logo associated with Harley-Davidson, Inc., on 18the left portion of the plates and the words “share the road” on the bottom portion of 19the plates. Special group plates under par. (f) 63. shall display the words “Trout 20Unlimited.” Special group plates under par. (f) 65m. shall display the words “Help 21Cure Childhood Cancer” in purple lettering and a symbol comprised of a purple 22handprint superimposed upon a red heart superimposed upon a gold ribbon. 23Special group plates under par. (f) 66. shall display the words “Scouting Alumni” 24and, at the option of the vehicle owner, either a logo or symbol associated with the 1Boy Scouts of America or a logo or symbol associated with the Eagle Scouts. Special 2group plates under par. (f) 67. shall display a logo or symbol associated with 3Whitetails Unlimited. Special group plates under par. (f) 68. shall display a logo or 4symbol associated with the Wisconsin Rocky Mountain Elk Foundation. Special 5group plates under par. (f) 69. shall display the words “Nurses Change Lives” and 6an image of a heart partially encircled by a stethoscope. Notwithstanding par. (e), 7special group plates under par. (f) 33m. and 48m. shall be the same color and design 8that was specified by the department for special group plates under par. (f) 33. and 948., respectively, immediately prior to January 1, 2007. The design for special 10group plates under par. (f) 33. and 48. shall be different from the design of special 11group plates under par. (f) 33m. and 48m., respectively.AB548,312Section 3. 341.14 (6r) (f) 19g. of the statutes is created to read:AB548,4,1413341.14 (6r) (f) 19g. Persons awarded the global war on terrorism service 14medal.AB548,415Section 4. 341.14 (6r) (fm) 7. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 16Act 15, is amended to read:AB548,4,2417341.14 (6r) (fm) 7. After October 1, 1998, additional authorized special groups 18may only be special groups designated by the department under this paragraph. 19The authorized special groups enumerated in par. (f) shall be limited solely to those 20special groups specified under par. (f) on October 1, 1998. This subdivision does not 21apply to the special groups specified under par. (f) 3m., 6m., 9g., 9m., 12g., 12m., 2215m., 15n., 15o., 15p., 15q., 19g., 19m., 33m., 48m., 49d., 49h., 49s., 54., 55., 55m., 2356., 57., 58., 59., 60., 61., 61m., 61r., 62., 63., 64., 65., 65m., 66., 67., 68., 69., 70., and 2471.AB548,51Section 5. Effective date.AB548,5,32(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 10th month beginning after 3publication.AB548,5,44